Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-101.02
Nebraska State Historical Society; board of trustees; powers and duties; Nebraska State Historical Society Collections Trust Fund; created.

In accordance with applicable law, the powers and duties of the board of trustees shall be as follows:

(1) To establish a date, time, and location for an annual meeting of the society and promulgate same and to elect annually from among their number a president, a first vice president, a second vice president, and a treasurer;

(2) To adopt bylaws not inconsistent with state statutes for their own governance and to administer the society in the interests of preserving the rich heritage of this state and its people;

(3) To select a director or chief executive officer who shall also serve as secretary to the board of trustees, and to prescribe the director's duties and responsibilities;

(4) To create a general membership class which shall be open to all persons interested in the accomplishment of the purposes of the society, and the active members of such class shall be eligible to vote and shall not be required to pay membership dues;

(5) To create such other classes of membership in the society as the board deems desirable, to determine the qualifications for such classes of membership, and to set the fees to be paid for such memberships;

(6) To create such committees as the board deems advisable and delegate to the committees those functions which aid in the efficient administration of the affairs of the society;

(7) To, according to appropriate museum and archival standards, collect, assemble, preserve, classify, and exhibit, where appropriate, all books, pamphlets, maps, manuscripts, newspapers, photographs, business records, personal papers, diaries, architectural records, works of art, films, videotapes, machine-readable records, museum, archeological, and ethnographic specimens, and all other objects regardless of physical form that serve to illustrate the history of Nebraska and the Great Plains in particular, or of western America in general;

(8) To ensure that the collections and properties of the society are maintained in good order and repair;

(9) To accept, receive, and administer in the name of the society any gifts, donations, properties, securities, bequests, and legacies that may be made to the society. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, the Nebraska State Historical Society may accept a gift of any property other than real estate without prior permission of any other governmental entity, including the Governor;

(10) To contract and enter into agreements necessary to effectuate the objects and purposes of the society;

(11) To sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of books, museum objects, or other property in the society's collections that are surplus, duplicate, outside the scope of the society's mission, or which lack research, educational, or exhibit value on account of damage or insufficient documentation. Such sums as are derived from the sale or disposition of property that is surplus, duplicate, outside the scope of the society's mission, or which lacks research, educational, or exhibit value on account of damage or insufficient documentation shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska State Historical Society Collections Trust Fund, which fund is hereby established. The fund shall be administered by the society. The fund shall be used, in accordance with appropriate museum and archival standards, exclusively for the acquisition, preservation, or restoration of the society collections;

(12) To disseminate and interpret the results of the society's research through publications, exhibitions, reports, public programs, and all other appropriate methods which will promote the study, understanding, and appreciation of Nebraska history; and

(13) To adopt and promulgate all policies, rules, and regulations, not inconsistent with law, that are necessary to implement the objects and purposes of the society.

Laws 1994, LB 1236, § 3.